Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2429.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6770YH (3) 91 sc/ns H.F. 2429 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 7A.26 State publications ââ 1 prohibited terms. 2 1. As used in this section: 3 a. âOfficial government materialâ means a guidance, rule, 4 briefing, press release, or publication prepared by a state 5 agency. 6 b. âState agencyâ means a department, authority, agency, 7 commission, board, institution, division, or office of the 8 state. 9 2. A state agency shall not use the term âWest Bankâ to 10 refer to Judea and Samaria in official government material. 11 3. A state agency shall not use state moneys to create 12 official government material that uses the term âWest Bankâ to 13 refer to Judea and Samaria. 14 4. The head of a state agency may waive the prohibitions of 15 subsections 2 and 3 if the head of the state agency determines 16 that waiving the prohibitions is in the interest of the state 17 and submits a written explanation of the waiver no later than 18 thirty days after making the determination to the general 19 assembly or to the legislative council if the general assembly 20 is not in session. 21